District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.16

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter shall apply 6 months after May 13, 2008.

(b)

In the case of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date set forth in subsection (a) of this section, this chapter shall apply on the earlier of the date of the termination of the agreement or the date that occurs 18 months after the effective date set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 17, 55 DCR 3452

History